Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-305
Board; annual report.

The Nebraska Grape and Winery Board shall make and publish an annual report on or before January 1 of each year, which report shall set forth in detail the following:

(1) The name and address of each board member and a copy of all rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the board; and

(2) A detailed explanation of all programs for which the board approved funding that fiscal year, pursuant to section 53-304, for the research, discovery, promotion, and development of programs for the growing, production, and marketing of Nebraska wines, grapes, fruits, berries, honey, and other agricultural products and their byproducts grown and produced in Nebraska for use in the wine industry.

Each annual report shall be presented to the Nebraska Liquor Control Commission within thirty days after its publication and made available also to any person who requests a copy. Except for the annual copy required by this section to be provided to the commission, the board may charge a nominal fee to cover the costs of printing and postage for making available copies of its annual reports.

Laws 2000, LB 477, § 5.